New Jersey, session 222, S2128.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The State Board of Medical Examiners shall ensure that the average time to grant or deny an application for a license to practice medicine and surgery shall not exceed 51 days from the date the board has received all information necessary to process an application for licensure. b.    The board shall annually submit a report to the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), which provides information on the progress of the board towards the performance measure target provided in subsection a. of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day next following enactment.